Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-6727
Medication
Aide Registry; contents.

(1) The department shall
list each medication aide registration in the Medication Aide Registry as
a Medication Aide-40-Hour, Medication Aide-20-Hour, or Medication Aide. A
listing in the registry shall be valid for the term of the registration and
upon renewal unless such listing is refused renewal or is removed as provided
in section 71-6730.

(2) The registry shall contain the following information
on each individual who meets the conditions in section 71-6726: (a) The individual's
full name; (b) information necessary to identify individuals, including those
qualified to provide medications in nursing homes, intermediate care facilities
for persons with developmental disabilities, or
assisted-living facilities; (c) any conviction of a felony or misdemeanor
reported to the department; and (d) other information as the department may
require by rule and regulation.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1288;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 41.
September 6, 2013